West Virginia, session 2026, SB1039.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. CRIMES AGAINST CHASTITY, MORALITY AND DECENCY. §61-8-9. Indecent exposure. (a) A person is guilty of indecent exposure when such person intentionally exposes his or her sex organs or anus or the sex organs or anus of another person, or intentionally causes such exposure by another or engages in any overt act of sexual gratification, or when a biological male undresses in a women's locker room, and does so under circumstances in which the person knows that the conduct is likely to cause affront or alarm: Provided, That it is not considered indecent exposure for a mother to breast feed a child in any location, public or private.(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be confined in jail not more than ninety days, or fined not more than $250, or both fined and confined.(c) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (a) of this section by intentionally exposing himself or herself to another person and the exposure was done for the purpose of sexual gratification, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $500 or confined in jail not more than twelve months, or both. For a second offense, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $1,000 and confined in jail for not less than thirty days nor more than twelve months. For a third or subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $3,000 and imprisoned in a state correctional facility for not less than one year nor more than five years.